District of Columbia statutes.
8-1102

Repealed

Comprehensive plan for multi-material recycling system.

Repealed.

July 25, 1987, D.C. Law 7-19, § 3, 34 DCR 3810
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(f), 61 DCR 9971
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.
1981 Ed., § 6-3202.